Utah statutes.
17C-2-603.   Court award for court costs and attorney fees, relocation
expenses, and damage to fixtures or personal property.
If a property owner brings an action in district court contesting an agency's
exercise of eminent domain against that owner's property, the court may:
(1)  award court costs and a reasonable attorney fee, as determined by the
court, to the owner, if the amount of the court or jury award for the property
exceeds the amount offered by the agency;
(2)  award a reasonable sum, as determined by the court or jury, as
compensation for any costs and expenses of relocating an owner who occupied
the acquired property, a party conducting a business on the acquired property,
or a person displaced from the property, as permitted by Title 57, Chapter 12,
Utah Relocation Assistance Act; and
(3)  award an amount, as determined by the court or jury, to compensate for
any fixtures or personal property that is:
(a)  owned by the owner of the acquired property or by a person conducting a
business on the acquired property; and
(b)  damaged as a result of the acquisition or relocation.
